North Carolina, session 2025, HB1051.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to MedAid
Foundation Incorporated, a nonprofit organization, to expand healthcare access, improve senior
care, and strengthen community health systems for vulnerable populations who face barriers to
healthcare access, including the lack of affordable supplies, limited preventive care, and
inadequate support from existing facilities.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2026.
*H1051-v-1*